Louisiana, session 2026, HB94.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:95.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§95.11. Firearm dispossession; prohibition; due process
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no firearm shall be
confiscated, seized, taken, or transferred from a law-abiding citizen without due
process of law.
B. No governmental entity shall accept federal funding or grants for the
implementation, service, or enforcement of a federal statute, order, rule, or regulation
that purports to implement or enforce the seizure, taking, or transfer of a firearm
from a law-abiding citizen without due process of law.
C. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined not more
than ten thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than
two years, or both.
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-202 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 94
(1) "Due process" means the constitutional requirement that an individual
be provided notice, the opportunity to be heard, and a decision by a neutral
decision-maker when the government acts in such a manner that denies the
individual of life, liberty, or a property interest. The term also includes a
demonstration from the government that there is an articulated standard of conduct
for its actions with sufficient justification.
(2) "Firearm" means any pistol, revolver, rifle, shotgun, machine gun,
submachine gun, black powder weapon, or assault rifle which is designed to fire or
is capable of firing fixed cartridge ammunition or from which a shot or projectile is
discharged by an explosive.
(3) "Law-abiding citizen" means a person who is not prohibited from
possessing a firearm pursuant to R.S. 14:95.1, 18 U.S.C. 922(g), or any other state
or federal law.